Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6552
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development and the Department of Revenue, in consultation with the Governor, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Grow the Good Life Act.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 9.
April 17, 2026